District of Columbia statutes.
2-358.02a

Surplus property disposition agreements.

(a)

The CPO may enter into an agreement with a District agency not otherwise under the authority of the CPO, including an independent agency or a public charter school, to sell its surplus goods.

(b)

OCP may charge an administrative fee of 6% of gross proceeds for the sale of surplus property sold pursuant to an agreement entered into under this section. The administrative fees shall be deposited into the Surplus Property Sales Fund established by § 2-358.05.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 802a
as added Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 1012(a), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 1012(a) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).